District of Columbia statutes.
47-1206

Power and duty of Mayor to reassess.

The Mayor of the District of Columbia is hereby authorized and directed, in any case where a special assessment for public improvements in the District of Columbia, other than an assessment levied by a jury in a condemnation proceeding, has been or hereafter may be quashed, set aside, or declared void by any court for any reason other than the right of the public authorities to levy an assessment for such improvement, to reassess the property in accordance with the benefits received from such improvement, after notice to the owner of the property and an opportunity afforded him to be heard, the hearing to be had before such agent or agents as the Mayor may designate. At such hearing physical facts which may be ascertained by view may be considered, whether proved or not. Such agent or agents shall report in writing to the Mayor the substance of the evidence taken and the arguments made at the hearing, together with the findings (which may include a statement of any physical facts not proved at the hearing which may be ascertained by view) and the recommendations of such agent or agents. A copy of such report, findings, and recommendations shall be mailed to the protestant 10 days before being presented to the Mayor, and the protestant may, before such report, findings, and recommendations are presented to the Mayor, file with such agent or agents exceptions to such report and findings, which exceptions shall be presented to the Mayor with such report, findings, and recommendations. The reassessment shall be made within 1 year from the date the judgment or decree quashing, setting aside, or declaring void the assessment becomes final and not subject to review. Notice of such reassessment shall be given the property owner in the same manner as if such reassessment was an original assessment, and such reassessment shall bear interest and be collected in the same manner as if such reassessment was an original assessment.

June 25, 1938, 52 Stat. 1201, ch. 702, § 6
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Real property assessments and taxes, reassessment of void assessments, see § 47-839.
Street repairs, sidewalk, curbing, and alley improvements, cancellation and reassessment of assessments, see § 9-421.11.
Water main and sewer service assessments, reassessment of void assessments, see § 34-2405.06.
1981 Ed., § 47-1206.
1973 Ed., § 47-1106.